North Carolina, session 2025, HB1023.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. This act shall be known as the "Divine Nine Special Registration Plate
Act."
SECTION 2. G.S. 20-79.4(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Types. – The Division shall issue the following types of special registration plates:
…
() Sigma Gamma Rho Sorority. – Issuable to a registered owner of a motor
vehicle. The plate shall bear the sorority's symbol and name and the phrase
"Greater Service, Greater Progress."
…."
SECTION 3. G.S. 20-79.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 20-79.7. Fees for special registration plates and distribution of the fees.
…
(a1) Fees. – All other special registration plates are subject to the regular motor vehicle
registration fee in G.S. 20-87 or G.S. 20-88 plus an additional fee in the following amount:

Special Plate Additional Fee Amount
Alpha Kappa Alpha Sorority $20.00
Alpha Phi Alpha Fraternity $30.00
…
Daniel Stowe Botanical Garden Expired July 1, 2016
Delta Sigma Theta Sorority $20.00
El Pueblo Expired July 1, 2016
…
In God We Trust $30.00
Kappa Alpha Psi Fraternity $20.00
Keeping the Lights On $30.00
…
Personalized $30.00
*H1023-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Phi Beta Sigma Fraternity $20.00
Pilot Mountain State Park $30.00
…
Share the Road $30.00
Sigma Gamma Rho Sorority $20.00
S.T.A.R. Expired July 1, 2016
…
(b) Distribution of Fees. – The Special Registration Plate Account and the Collegiate and
Cultural Attraction Plate Account are established within the Highway Fund. The Division must
credit the additional fee imposed for the special registration plates listed in subsection (a1) of this
section among the Special Registration Plate Account (SRPA), the Collegiate and Cultural
Attraction Plate Account (CCAPA), the North Carolina Land and Water Fund (NCLWF) which
is established under G.S. 143B-135.234, and the Parks and Recreation Trust Fund, which is
established under G.S. 143B-135.56, as follows:

Special Plate SRPA CCAPA NCLWF PRTF
AIDS Awareness – Expired
July 1, 2016
Alpha Kappa Alpha Sorority $10 $10 0 0
Alpha Phi Alpha Fraternity $10 $20 0 0
…
Daughters of the American
Revolution – Expired July 1,
2016
Delta Sigma Theta Sorority $10 $10 0 0
Donate Life $10 $10 0 0
…
Kappa Alpha Order – Expired
July 1, 2016
Kappa Alpha Psi Fraternity $10 $10 0 0
Keeping The Lights On $10 $20 0 0
…
Pisgah Conservancy $10 $20 0 0
Phi Beta Sigma Fraternity $10 $10 0 0
POW/MIA Bring Them Home $10 $10 0 0
…
Share the Road $10 $20 0 0
Sigma Gamma Rho Sorority $10 $20 0 0
Sneads Ferry Shrimp Festival –
Expired July 1, 2016
…."
SECTION 4. G.S. 20-81.12 is amended by adding the following new subsections to
read:
"() Alpha Kappa Alpha Sorority. – The Division shall transfer quarterly the money in the
Collegiate and Cultural Attraction Plate Account derived from the sale of the Alpha Kappa Alpha
Sorority plates to the Alpha Kappa Alpha Educational Advancement Foundation, Inc.
() Delta Sigma Theta Sorority. – The Division shall transfer quarterly the money in the
Collegiate and Cultural Attraction Plate Account derived from the sale of the Delta Sigma Theta
Sorority plates to the Delta Research and Educational Foundation.
Page 2 House Bill 1023-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
() Kappa Alpha Psi Fraternity. – The Division shall transfer quarterly the money in the
Collegiate and Cultural Attraction Plate Account derived from the sale of the Kappa Alpha Psi
Fraternity plates to the Kappa Alpha Psi Foundation.
() Phi Beta Sigma Fraternity. – The Division shall transfer quarterly the money in the
Collegiate and Cultural Attraction Plate Account derived from the sale of the Phi Beta Sigma
Fraternity plates to The Sigmas of North Carolina, Inc.
() Sigma Gamma Rho Sorority. – The Division shall transfer quarterly the money in the
Collegiate and Cultural Attraction Plate Account derived from the sale of the Sigma Gamma Rho
Sorority plates to the Sigma Gamma Rho Sorority National Education Fund, Inc."
SECTION 5. The Revisor of Statutes is authorized to alphabetize, number, and
renumber the special registration plates listed in G.S. 20-79.4(b) and G.S. 20-81.12 to ensure that
all of the special registration plates are listed in alphabetical order and numbered accordingly.
SECTION 6. This act is effective when it becomes law.
House Bill 1023-First Edition Page 3